Wyoming, session 2025, SF0084.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 35-7-111(a)(xiii)(A) and
35-7-119(e)(ii), by creating new paragraphs (iii) through
(v) and by amending and renumbering (iii) as (vi) are
amended to read:
35-7-111. Prohibited acts.
(a) No person shall:
(xiii) Include the term "meat" or any synonymous
term for meat or a specific animal species in labeling,
advertising or other sales promotion unless the product:
(A) Is consistent with the definition of
meat in W.S. 35-7-119(e)(iii)(A) 35-7-119(e)(vi)(A); and
35-7-119. Fair packaging and labeling provisions.
(e) The department shall promulgate rules with
respect to labeling. Every retailer and every wholesaler
who sells or offers for sale in this state through an
establishment or otherwise any:
(ii) Cell cultured or plant based products not
consistent with the definition of meat in subparagraph
(iii)(A) (vi)(A) of this subsection and not derived from
1

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0084
ENROLLED ACT NO. 51, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
harvested livestock, poultry, wildlife or exotic livestock
as those terms are defined in W.S. 11-26-101(a),
11-32-101(a)(iv), 23-1-101(a)(xiii) and 23-1-102(a)(xvi),
shall clearly label cell cultured products as "containing
cell cultured product" and clearly label plant based
products as "vegetarian", "veggie", "vegan", "plant based"
or other similar term indicating that the product is plant
based;
(iii) Only beef that is derived from cattle
born, raised, slaughtered and processed in the United
States may clearly be labeled as a product of the United
States of America;
(iv) Only beef that is derived from cattle born
and raised in the state of Wyoming may clearly be labeled
as a product of Wyoming;
(v) Beef that is of undeterminable origin or
that has not been born, raised, slaughtered and processed
in the United States of America shall not be labeled as a
product of the United States of America;
(iii)(vi) As used in this subsection:
(A) "Meat" means the edible part of the
muscle of animals, which is skeletal or which is found in
the tongue, in the diaphragm, in the heart or in the
esophagus, with or without the accompanying or overlying
fat, and the portions of bone, skin, sinew, nerve and blood
vessels which normally accompany the muscle tissue and
which are not separated from it in the process of dressing,
but shall not include the muscle found in the lips, snout
2

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0084
ENROLLED ACT NO. 51, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
or ears, nor any edible part of the muscle which has been
manufactured, cured, smoked, cooked or processed;
(B) "Retailer" means a person regularly
engaged in the business of selling meat at retail to the
public, and selling only to the user or consumer and not
for resale;
(C) "Wholesaler" means a person regularly
engaged in the business of selling meat at wholesale to
retailers for subsequent sale at retail to the public;.
(D) "Beef" means any meat from cattle,
including veal.
3

ORIGINAL SENATE ENGROSSED
FILE NO. SF0084
ENROLLED ACT NO. 51, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
4